Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 10 Consolidation of Schools [Repealed.]

16-10-1 — 16-10-5.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1898, ch. 544, §§ 1, 5, 7, 8; P.L. 1900, ch. 743, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 74, §§ 1, 4, 6, 7; P.L. 1915, ch. 1235, § 1; P.L. 1922, ch. 2234, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 81, §§ 1, 4, 6, 7; P.L. 1936, ch. 2375, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 197, §§ 1, 4, 6, 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 197, § 12; P.L. 1939, ch. 690, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §§

16-10-1

— 16-10-5; Repealed by P.L. 1960, ch. 27, § 12, and P.L. 1980, ch. 395, § 1.